Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1311.01
Corridor map; copy; transmit.

The department shall transmit a copy of the map required by subsection (2) of section 39-1311 to the officer responsible for review of preliminary subdivision plats and to the officer responsible for issuance of building permits or, if subdivision plats or building permits are not required in the county or municipality, to the county clerk of the county in which the corridor is located.

Laws 1974, LB 805, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 8.